hungarian.script
clear stack

echo >> FILTER FOR HUNGARIAN NOUNS

echo >> DEFINING ALPHABET / VOWELS
define BackV [a | á | o | ó | u | ú];
define FrontUnroundV [e | é | i | í];
define FrontRoundV [ö | ő | ü | ű];
define FrontVowel [FrontRoundV | FrontUnroundV];
define Vowel [BackV | FrontUnroundV | FrontRoundV];

echo >> DEFINING ALPHABET / CONSONANTS
define SingleCons [j | m | n | l | r | b | d | g | v | z | p | t | k | f | s | c];
define ComplCons [{ly} | {ny} | {zs} | {dz} | {dzs} | {gy} | {sz} |{cs} | {ty} ];
define Cons [SingleCons | ComplCons];

echo >> DEFINING SPECIFIC WORDEND
define WE1 [j | {gy} | {ly} | {ny} | {ty} | s | {sz} | {zs} | {cs} | z | f | {ch} | h];
define WE2 [j |{ly} | n | {ny} | s | {sz} | {zs} ] ;
define WE3 [jj | mm | nn | ss | ll | bb | dd | gg | rr | pp | tt | kk | ff | cc | vv | zz | {lly} | {nny} | {ggy} | {tty} ];
define WE4 [{gy} | {ly} | {ny} | {ty} | {ny}];

echo >> DEFINING RULES
define RegNumber [O -> 0 || Vowel _ k ?* ,, O -> o || BackV Cons+ _ k ?* ,, 
               O -> e || FrontUnroundV Cons+ _ k ?* ,, O -> ö || FrontRoundV (i) Cons+ _ k ?* ];
define IrregNumber [A -> a || BackV Cons+ _ k ,, A -> e || FrontVowel Cons+ _ k];
define RegPoss13PPl [[U|O] -> 0 || Vowel _ Cons+ ?* ,, U -> u || BackV Cons+ _ (n) k ?* ,, 
                  U -> ü || FrontVowel Cons+ _ (n) k ?*];
define RegPoss2PPl [O -> 0 || Vowel _ [t O k] ,, O -> o || BackV Cons+ _ [t O k] ,, O -> ö || FrontRoundV Cons+ _ [t O k] ?* ,, O -> ö || ö Cons+ _ [t O k] ?* ,, O -> e || FrontUnroundV Cons+ _ [t O k] ?* ];
define IrregPoss2PPl [A -> a || BackV Cons+ _ [t O k] ?* ,, A -> e || FrontUnroundV Cons+ _ [t O k] ?*,, A -> ö || FrontRoundV Cons+ _ [t O k] ?*];
define RegPoss2PPl2 [O -> o || BackV t _ k ?* ,, O -> e || FrontUnroundV t _ k ?* ,, O -> ö || FrontRoundV t _ k ?*];
define RegPoss3PSg [O -> a || BackV Cons+ (j) _ [Vowel+|Cons+] ?* ,, O -> a || BackV (~[WE1]) (j) _  (.#.) ,, O -> e || FrontUnroundV (~[WE1]) (j) _ (.#.) ];
define RegPoss3PPl [U -> u || BackV (~[WE1]) (j) _ k ?* ,, U -> ü || FrontVowel (Cons+) (j) _ k ?*];
define RegPoss2PSg [O -> a || BackV (j) _ ?* ,, O -> o || BackV Cons+ _ [m|d] ?* ,, O -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) (j) _ ([m|d]) ?*]; 
define IrregPoss3PSg [A -> a || BackV Cons+ _ ?* ,, A -> e || FrontVowel Cons+ _ ?* ] ;
define PossNumber [Y -> 0 || Vowel _ i ?* ,, Y -> e || FrontVowel Cons+ _ i ?* ,, Y -> a || BackV Cons+ _ i ?*];
define PossNumber2 [E -> o || BackV i t _ k ,, E -> e || FrontVowel i t _ k];
define AccPoss [[Â|Ö] -> 0 || Vowel _ t ,, Â -> a || [a i] Cons+ _ t ,, Â -> e || [e i] Cons+ _ t];
define AccReg [Ö -> 0 || [Vowel|WE2] _ t.#. ,, Ö -> e || FrontUnroundV Cons+ _ t.#. ,, Ö -> ö || FrontRoundV Cons+ _ t.#. ,,
               Ö -> o || BackV (Cons+) _ t.#.];
define AccIrreg [Â -> 0 || Vowel _ t .#. ,, Â -> a || BackV (Cons+) _ t.#. ,, Â -> e || FrontVowel Cons+ _ t.#. ];
define AccPl [o -> a || [[o k]|[o m]|[o d]|[n k]|[ó k]|[ó m]|[ó d]] _ t.#.] ;
define LocPoss [ Ö -> o || [a i] Cons+ _ [n|b] ?* ,, Ö -> e ||[e i] Cons+ _ [n|b] ?* ];
define Loc [Ö -> 0 || Vowel _ n ?* ,, Ö -> ö || FrontRoundV Cons+ _ [n|b] ?* ,, Ö -> o || BackV Cons+ _ [n|b] ?* ,, 
            Ö -> e || FrontUnroundV Cons+ _ [n|b] ?*];
define IllInessPoss [Ä -> a || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) b _ (n) ,, Ä -> e || [e i] Cons+ b _ (n).#.];
define IllIness [Ä -> a || BackV (Cons+) b _ (n).#. ,, Ä -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) b _ (n).#.];
define ElaDelaAblaPoss [ Ó -> ó || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) [b|t|r] _ l.#. ,, Ó -> ő || [e i] Cons+ [b|t|r] _ l.#.];
define ElaDelaAbla [Ó -> ó || BackV (Cons+) [b|t|r] _ l.#. ,, Ó -> ő || FrontVowel (Cons+) [b|t|r] _ l.#.];
define AdessPoss [Ä -> á || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) n _ l.#. ,, Ä -> é || [e i] Cons+ n _ l.#.];
define Adess [Ä -> á || BackV (Cons+) n _ l.#. ,, Ä -> é || FrontVowel (Cons+) n _ l.#.];
define DatPoss [Ä -> a || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) n _ k.#. ,, Ä -> e || [e i] Cons+ n _ k.#.];
define Dat [Ä -> a || BackV (Cons+) n _ k.#. ,, Ä -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) n _ k.#.];
define SublaPoss [Ä -> a || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) r _.#. ,, Ä -> e || [e i] Cons+ r _ .#.];
define Subla [Ä -> a || BackV (Cons+) r _.#. ,, Ä -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) r _ .#.];
define AllaPoss [Ö -> o || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) h _ z.#. ,, Ö -> e || [e i] Cons+ h _ z.#.];
define Alla [Ö -> o || BackV (Cons+) h _ z.#. ,, Ö -> e ||  FrontUnroundV (Cons+) h _ z.#. ,, Ö -> ö || FrontRoundV (Cons+) h _ z.#.];
define InstrTransPoss [Ä -> a || BackV Cons* [a i|i] (Cons+) v _ (l) .#. ,, Ä -> e || [e i] (Cons+) v _ (l) .#.];
define InstrTrans [Ä -> a || BackV (Cons+) v _ (l) .#. ,, Ä -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) v _ (l) .#.];
define TransV [a -> á || [BackV|[a i]] (Cons+) v _ .#. ,, e -> é || [FrontVowel|[e i]] (Cons+) v _ .#.];
define InstrCons [t -> tt, v -> vv, m -> mm, n -> nn, l -> ll, z -> zz, b -> bb, d -> dd, g -> gg, p -> pp, k -> kk , j -> jj,
                 f -> ff, s -> ss, c -> cc, r -> rr || _ [v [a|e|á|é] ] (l) .#.];
define InstrCons2 [[l y] -> [l l y], [g y] -> [g g y], [n y] -> [n n y], [z s] -> [z z s], [c s] -> [c c s], 
                   [t y] -> [t t y], [c h] -> [c c h], [d z] -> [d d z] || _ v [a|e|é|á] (l) .#.];
define VDelete [v -> 0 || WE3 _ [a|e|á|é] (l).#.];
define DistrPoss [[Â|Ö] -> 0 || [[a i]|[e i]|i] _ [n k é n t].#.];
define DistrPoss1 [[Â|Ö] -> a || [a i|i] Cons+ _ [n k é n t].#. ,, [Â|Ö] -> e || [e i] Cons+ _ [n k é n t].#.];
define DistrReg [Ö -> a || BackV (Cons+) _ [n k é n t].#. ,, Ö -> e || FrontUnroundV (Cons+) _ [n k é n t].#. ,, 
                 Ö -> ö || FrontRoundV (Cons+) _ [n k é n t].#.];
define DistrIrreg [Â -> a || BackV (Cons+) _ [n k é n t].#. ,, Â -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) _ [n k é n t].#.];
define SocVDelete [ [Ö|Â] -> 0 || Vowel _ [s t U l]];
define SocReg [Ö -> a || BackV (Cons+) _ [s t U l].#. ,, Ö -> e || FrontUnroundV (Cons+) _ [s t U l].#. ,, 
               Ö -> ö || FrontRoundV (Cons+) _ [s t U l].#.];
define SocIrreg [Â -> a || BackV (Cons+) _ [s t U l].#. ,, Â -> e || FrontVowel (Cons+) _ [s t U l].#.];
define SocU [U -> u || BackV s t _ l.#. ,, U -> ü || FrontVowel s t _ l.#.];
define CleanAccSpecCons [o -> 0, e -> 0 || [WE4|WE2] _ t.#.] ;
define CleanAElomStems [e -> 0, o -> 0 || l _ [m [a|e|u|o|ü|é]] ?* ];
define CleanRegPoss2PSg [j -> 0 || WE1 _ [a|u]];

read regex RegNumber .o. IrregNumber .o. RegPoss13PPl .o. RegPoss2PPl .o. IrregPoss2PPl .o. RegPoss2PPl2 
 .o. RegPoss3PSg .o. RegPoss3PPl .o. RegPoss2PSg .o. IrregPoss3PSg .o. PossNumber .o. PossNumber2 .o. AccPoss .o. AccReg .o. AccIrreg 
 .o. AccPl .o. LocPoss .o. Loc .o. IllInessPoss .o. IllIness .o. ElaDelaAblaPoss 
 .o. ElaDelaAbla .o. AdessPoss .o. Adess .o. DatPoss .o. Dat .o. SublaPoss .o. Subla .o. AllaPoss .o. Alla .o. InstrTransPoss .o. InstrTrans .o. TransV .o. InstrCons 
 .o. InstrCons2 .o. VDelete .o. DistrPoss .o. DistrPoss1 .o. DistrReg .o. DistrIrreg .o. SocVDelete 
 .o. SocReg .o. SocIrreg .o. SocU .o. CleanAccSpecCons .o. CleanAElomStems .o. CleanRegPoss2PSg;

define Rules;

read lexc < hun13-lex.lexc;
define HunNouns;

read regex HunNouns .o. Rules;

#apply up < HungarianUp.txt
apply down < HungarianDown.txt;

#see the corresponding sets of outputs in corresponding files.
